pl: Cechy ładowarki do akumulatora pojazdu: Sprawdzanie alternatora; Automatyczne wyłączanie / tryb podtrzymania; Tryb konserwacji akumulatora; Tryb testowania akumulatora; Kable z zaciskami w zestawie; Tryb odsiarczania / regeneracji; Wyświetlacz (LCD/LED); Rozruch silnika / tryb wspomagania; Chłodzenie wentylatorem; Zabezpieczenie przed przegrzaniem; Zabezpieczenie przed przeładowaniem; Uchwyt do przenoszenia; Wiązka z szybkozłączką w zestawie; Tryb naprawy; Zabezpieczenie przed odwrotną polaryzacją; Zabezpieczenie przed zwarciem; Zaciski iskrobezpieczne; Kompensacja temperatury; Możliwość montażu na ścianie; Inne
vi: Tính năng của bộ sạc pin xe hơi: Kiểm tra máy phát điện; Tự động tắt/Chế độ duy trì (float); Chế độ bảo dưỡng ắc quy; Chế độ kiểm tra ắc quy; Kèm kẹp cáp; Chế độ khử sulfat/phục hồi; Màn hình (LCD/LED); Khởi động động cơ/Chế độ kích; Làm mát bằng quạt; Bảo vệ quá nhiệt; Bảo vệ sạc quá mức; Tay cầm di động; Kèm bộ dây nối nhanh; Chế độ sửa chữa; Bảo vệ ngược cực; Bảo vệ ngắn mạch; Kẹp chống tia lửa điện; Bù nhiệt độ; Có thể treo tường; Khác
fr: Fonctionnalités du chargeur de batterie de véhicule: Vérification de l’alternateur; Arrêt automatique/mode de maintien; Mode de maintien de batterie; Mode de test de batterie; Fils de pince inclus; Mode de désulfatation/reconditionnement; Affichage (LCD/LED); Mode de démarrage du moteur/survoltage; Refroidi par ventilateur; Protection contre la surchauffe; Protection contre les surcharges; Poignée de transport; Faisceau à connexion rapide inclus; Mode de réparation; Protection contre l’inversion de polarité; Protection contre les courts-circuits; Pinces anti-étincelles; Compensation de la température; Fixation murale; Autre
ko: 차량용 배터리 충전기 기능: 교류 발전기 점검; 자동 차단/플로트 모드; 배터리 유지 모드; 배터리 테스트 모드; 클램프 리드 포함; 탈황/리컨디셔닝 모드; 디스플레이(LCD/LED); 엔진 시동/부스트 모드; 팬 냉각; 과열 방지; 과충전 방지; 휴대용 핸들; 퀵 커넥트 하네스 포함; 수리 모드; 역극성 보호; 단락 보호; 스파크 방지 클램프; 온도 보상; 벽걸이형; 기타
sk-SK: Funkcie nabíjačky autobatérií: Kontrola alternátora; Automatické vypnutie / udržiavací režim; Režim udržiavania batérie; Režim testovania batérie; Vrátane káblov so svorkami; Režim desulfatácie / regenerácie; Displej (LCD/LED); Štartovanie motora / režim zosilnenia (boost); Chladené ventilátorom; Ochrana proti prehriatiu; Ochrana proti prebitiu; Prenosná rukoväť; Vrátane rýchloupínacej kabeláže; Režim opravy; Ochrana proti prepólovaniu; Ochrana proti skratu; Svorky odolné voči iskrám; Teplotná kompenzácia; Možnosť montáže na stenu; Iné
tr: Araç akü şarj cihazı özellikleri: Alternatör kontrolü; Otomatik kapanma / bekleme (float) modu; Akü koruma modu; Akü test modu; Mandal uçları dahildir; Desülfasyon / yenileme modu; Ekran (LCD/LED); Motor çalıştırma / takviye modu; Fan soğutmalı; Aşırı sıcaklık koruması; Aşırı şarj koruması; Taşıma sapı; Hızlı bağlantı kablo demeti dahildir; Onarım modu; Ters kutup koruması; Kısa devre koruması; Kıvılcım korumalı mandallar; Sıcaklık telafisi; Duvara monte edilebilir; Diğer
nl: Voertuigacculader kenmerken: Dynamocontrole; Automatische uitschakeling/druppellaadmodus; Accu-onderhoudsmodus; Accutestmodus; Inclusief klemkabels; Desulfatatie-/reconditioneringsmodus; Display (lcd/led); Motorstart-/boostmodus; Met ventilator gekoeld; Bescherming tegen oververhitting; Bescherming tegen overbelasting; Draaghandvat; Inclusief snelaansluitkabelboom; Reparatiemodus; Bescherming tegen omgekeerde polariteit; Kortsluitingsbeveiliging; Vonkvrije klemmen; Temperatuurcompensatie; Geschikt voor wandmontage; Overig
pt-PT: Características do carregador de bateria para veículo: Verificação do alternador; Desativação automática / modo de flutuação; Modo de manutenção de bateria; Modo de teste de bateria; Inclui cabos com pinças; Modo de dessulfatação/recondicionamento; Ecrã (LCD/LED); Modo de arranque do motor/boost; Arrefecimento por ventoinha; Proteção contra temperatura excessiva; Proteção contra sobrecarga; Pega portátil; Inclui arnês de ligação rápida; Modo de reparação; Proteção contra inversão de polaridade; Proteção contra curtos-circuitos; Pinças à prova de faísca; Compensação de temperatura; Montagem na parede; Outro
th: คุณสมบัติของเครื่องชาร์จแบตเตอรี่รถยนต์: ตรวจเช็กอัลเทอร์เนเตอร์; ปิดเครื่องอัตโนมัติ / โหมดโฟลต; โหมดบำรุงรักษาแบตเตอรี่; โหมดทดสอบแบตเตอรี่; รวมสายชาร์จแบบคีบ; โหมดสลายซัลเฟต / โหมดฟื้นฟู; หน้าจอ (LCD/LED); โหมดสตาร์ทเครื่องยนต์ / โหมดบูสต์; ระบายความร้อนด้วยพัดลม; ระบบป้องกันอุณหภูมิเกิน; ระบบป้องกันการชาร์จไฟเกิน; ด้ามจับพกพา; รวมสายรัดแบบต่อด่วน; โหมดซ่อมแซม; ระบบป้องกันการต่อสลับขั้ว; ระบบป้องกันไฟฟ้าลัดวงจร; หัวหนีบกันประกายไฟ; ระบบชดเชยอุณหภูมิ; ติดผนังได้; อื่นๆ
it: Caratteristiche del caricabatterie per veicoli: Controllo alternatore; Spegnimento automatico/modalità mantenimento; Modalità mantenitore di carica; Modalità test batteria; Cavi con pinze inclusi; Modalità di desolfatazione/ricondizionamento; Display (LCD/LED); Modalità avvio motore/boost; Raffreddamento a ventola; Protezione da sovratemperatura; Protezione da sovraccarico; Maniglia per il trasporto; Cablaggio a connessione rapida incluso; Modalità riparazione; Protezione dall’inversione di polarità; Protezione dai cortocircuiti; Pinze antiscintilla; Compensazione della temperatura; Montabile a parete; Altro
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės akumuliatoriaus įkroviklio funkcijos: Generatoriaus patikra; Automatinis išjungimas / palaikymo režimas; Akumuliatoriaus palaikymo režimas; Akumuliatoriaus tikrinimo režimas; Su gnybtiniais laidais; Desulfatacijos / atnaujinimo režimas; Ekranas (LCD / LED); Variklio paleidimo / galios didinimo režimas; Aušinamas ventiliatoriumi; Apsauga nuo perkaitimo; Apsauga nuo perkrovos; Nešiojimo rankena; Pridedami greitojo prijungimo laidai; Taisymo režimas; Apsauga nuo atvirkštinio poliškumo; Apsauga nuo trumpojo jungimo; Kibirkščiavimo nepraleidžiantys gnybtai; Temperatūros kompensavimas; Tvirtinamas prie sienos; Kita
en: Vehicle battery charger features: Alternator check; Automatic shutoff / float mode; Battery maintainer mode; Battery test mode; Clamp leads included; Desulfation / reconditioning mode; Display (LCD/LED); Engine start / boost mode; Fan-cooled; Over-temperature protection; Overcharge protection; Portable handle; Quick-connect harness included; Repair mode; Reverse polarity protection; Short-circuit protection; Spark-proof clamps; Temperature compensation; Wall-mountable; Other
es: Características del cargador de batería del vehículo: Revisión del alternador; Apagado automático/modo de flotación; Modo de mantenimiento de batería; Modo de prueba de batería; Incluye cables con pinzas; Modo de desulfatación/reacondicionamiento; Pantalla (LCD/LED); Modo de arranque de motor/refuerzo; Refrigerado por ventilador; Protección contra sobrecalentamiento; Protección contra sobrecargas; Asa portátil; Incluye arnés de conexión rápida; Modo de reparación; Protección contra polaridad inversa; Protección contra cortocircuitos; Pinzas a prueba de chispas; Compensación de temperatura; Se puede montar en la pared; Otro
hr-HR: Karakteristike punjača za automobilske akumulatore: Provjera alternatora; Automatsko isključivanje / Održavanje (Float); Način rada za održavanje baterije; Način rada za testiranje baterije; Uključeni kabeli sa stezaljkama; Način rada za desulfatizaciju / obnavljanje; Zaslon (LCD/LED); Pokretanje motora / Način rada za pojačanje (Boost); Hlađenje ventilatorom; Zaštita od previsoke temperature; Zaštita od prekomjernog punjenja; Prijenosna ručka; Uključen kabelski svežanj za brzo spajanje; Način rada za popravak; Zaštita od obrnutog polariteta; Zaštita od kratkog spoja; Stezaljke zaštićene od iskrenja; Kompenzacija temperature; Mogućnost postavljanja na zid; Ostalo
ja: 車両用バッテリー充電器機能: オルタネーターチェック; 自動シャットオフ/フロートモード; バッテリーメンテナーモード; バッテリーテストモード; クランプリード付属; デサルフェーション/修復モード; ディスプレイ (LCD/LED); エンジンスターター/ブーストモード; ファン冷却; 過熱保護; 過充電保護; ポータブルハンドル; クイックコネクトハーネス付属; 修復モード; 逆極性保護; 短絡保護; スパーク防止クランプ; 温度補償; 壁掛け可能; その他
sl-SI: Lastnosti polnilnika akumulatorja vozila: Preverjanje alternatorja; Samodejni izklop/vzdrževalni način; Način vzdrževanja baterije; Način testiranja baterije; Priloženi kabli s sponkami; Način desulfatizacije/obnove; Zaslon (LCD/LED); Zagon motorja/način pospeševanja; Hlajenje z ventilatorjem; Zaščita pred previsoko temperaturo; Zaščita pred prenapolnjenjem; Prenosni ročaj; Priložena napeljava za hitro povezavo; Način popravila; Zaščita pred zamenjavo polov; Zaščita pred kratkim stikom; Sponke brez iskrenja; Kompenzacija temperature; Možnost pritrditve na steno; Drugo
bg-BG: Характеристики на зарядното устройство за автомобилни акумулатори: Проверка на алтернатора; Автоматично изключване / поддържащ режим; Режим на поддържане на батерията; Тестов режим на батерията; Включени кабели с щипки; Режим на десулфатизация / възстановяване; Дисплей (LCD/LED); Стартиране на двигател / режим на усилване; Охлаждане с вентилатор; Защита от прегряване; Защита от презареждане; Преносима дръжка; Включен кабелен сноп за бързо свързване; Режим на ремонт; Защита от обръщане на полярността; Защита от късо съединение; Искробезопасни щипки; Температурна компенсация; Възможност за стенен монтаж; Друго
cs: Vlastnosti nabíječky akumulátoru vozidla: Kontrola alternátoru; Automatické vypnutí / udržovací režim; Režim údržby baterie; Režim testování baterie; Včetně kabelů se svorkami; Režim desulfatace / obnovy; Displej (LCD/LED); Startování motoru / režim boost; Chlazené ventilátorem; Ochrana proti přehřátí; Ochrana proti přebití; Přenosná rukojeť; Včetně rychloupínací kabeláže; Režim opravy; Ochrana proti přepólování; Ochrana proti zkratu; Svorky odolné proti jiskření; Teplotní kompenzace; Možnost montáže na zeď; Jiné
fi: Ajoneuvon akkulaturin ominaisuudet: Laturin tarkistus; Automaattinen sammutus / ylläpitotila; Akun ylläpitotila; Akun testitila; Sisältää hauenleukakaapelit; Desulfatointi- / elvytystila; Näyttö (LCD/LED); Moottorin käynnistys- / tehotila; Tuuletinjäähdytteinen; Ylikuumenemissuoja; Ylilataussuoja; Kantokahva; Sisältää pikaliitinsarjan; Korjaustila; Väärän napaisuuden suoja; Oikosulkusuoja; Kipinöimättömät liittimet; Lämpötilan kompensointi; Seinään kiinnitettävä; Muu
hu: Jármű-akkumulátortöltő funkciói: Generátor-ellenőrzés; Automatikus kikapcsolás / Csepptöltés mód; Akkumulátor-karbantartó mód; Akkumulátorteszt mód; Csipeszes vezetékek mellékelve; Szulfátlanítás / Helyreállítás mód; Kijelző (LCD/LED); Motorindítás / Bikázó mód; Ventilátoros hűtés; Túlmelegedés elleni védelem; Túltöltés elleni védelem; Hordozófogantyú; Gyorscsatlakozós kábelkorbács mellékelve; Javítás mód; Fordított polaritás elleni védelem; Rövidzárlat elleni védelem; Szikramentes csipeszek; Hőmérséklet-kompenzáció; Falra szerelhető; Egyéb
zh-TW: 車輛電池充電器功能: 交流發電機檢查; 自動關機 / 浮充模式; 電池維護模式; 電池測試模式; 包含夾鉗式導線; 脫硫 / 修復模式; 顯示器 (LCD/LED); 引擎啟動 / 增壓模式; 風扇冷卻; 過熱保護; 過充保護; 便攜把手; 包含快接線束; 維修模式; 反接保護; 短路保護; 防火花夾鉗; 溫度補償; 可壁掛安裝; 其他
ro-RO: Caracteristicile încărcătorului de baterie auto: Verificare alternator; Oprire automată / mod de menținere (float); Mod de întreținere a bateriei; Mod de testare a bateriei; Cabluri cu cleme incluse; Mod de desulfatare / recondiționare; Afișaj (LCD/LED); Pornire motor / mod boost; Răcire cu ventilator; Protecție la supraîncălzire; Protecție la supraîncărcare; Mâner pentru transport; Cablaj cu conectare rapidă inclus; Mod de reparare; Protecție la inversarea polarității; Protecție la scurtcircuit; Cleme anti-scânteie; Compensare termică; Montare pe perete; Altele
ru: Особенности зарядного устройства автомобильного аккумулятора: Проверка генератора; Автоматическое отключение / буферный режим; Режим поддержки заряда; Режим тестирования аккумулятора; Клеммы-зажимы в комплекте; Режим десульфатации / восстановления; Дисплей (ЖК/Светодиодный); Запуск двигателя / режим Boost; С вентиляторным охлаждением; Защита от перегрева; Защита от перезаряда; Ручка для переноски; Провода для быстрого подключения в комплекте; Режим ремонта; Защита от обратной полярности; Защита от короткого замыкания; Искробезопасные зажимы; Температурная компенсация; Настенное крепление; Другое
zh-CN: 车辆电池充电器功能: 交流发电机检查; 自动关机 / 浮充模式; 电池维护模式; 电池测试模式; 含夹具引线; 脱硫 / 修复模式; 显示屏 (LCD/LED); 发动机启动 / 增压模式; 风扇冷却; 过温保护; 过充保护; 便携手柄; 含快接线束; 修复模式; 反极性保护; 短路保护; 防火花夹具; 温度补偿; 可壁挂; 其他
sv: Funktioner för fordonsbatteriladdare: Generatorkontroll; Automatisk avstängning/underhållsläge; Underhållsladdningsläge; Batteritestläge; Klämkablar ingår; Avsulfatering/rekonditioneringsläge; Skärm (LCD/LED); Motorstart/boost-läge; Fläktkyld; Övertemperaturskydd; Överladdningsskydd; Bärhandtag; Kablage för snabbanslutning ingår; Reparationsläge; Skydd mot omvänd polaritet; Kortslutningsskydd; Gnistfria klämmor; Temperaturkompensation; Väggmonterbar; Övrigt
de: Funktionen des Fahrzeugbatterieladegeräts: Lichtmaschinenprüfung; Automatische Abschaltung / Erhaltungsladung; Batterieerhaltungsmodus; Batterietestmodus; Klemmenkabel inklusive; Desulfatierungs- / Rekonditionierungsmodus; Display (LCD/LED); Motorstart- / Boost-Modus; Lüftergekühlt; Überhitzungsschutz; Überladungsschutz; Tragegriff; Schnellanschluss-Kabelbaum inklusive; Reparaturmodus; Verpolungsschutz; Kurzschlussschutz; Funkensichere Klemmen; Temperaturkompensation; Wandmontierbar; Sonstiges
da: Funktioner for batterioplader til køretøj: Generatortjek; Automatisk slukning/vedligeholdelsesfunktion; Batterivedligeholdelsesfunktion; Batteritesttilstand; Klemkabler medfølger; Desulfatering/rekonditioneringstilstand; Skærm (LCD/LED); Motorstart/boost-tilstand; Ventilatorkølet; Overtemperaturbeskyttelse; Overopladningsbeskyttelse; Bærbart håndtag; Lynkoblingsnet medfølger; Reparationstilstand; Beskyttelse mod omvendt polaritet; Kortslutningsbeskyttelse; Gnistfrie klemmer; Temperaturkompensation; Kan monteres på væg; Andet
pt-BR: Carregador de bateria veicular recursos: Verificação do alternador; Desligamento automático/modo de flutuação; Modo de manutenção de bateria; Modo de teste de bateria; Cabos com garras incluídos; Modo de dessulfatação/recondicionamento; Visor (LCD/LED); Partida do motor/modo de aumento de potência (boost); Resfriado por ventoinha; Proteção contra superaquecimento; Proteção contra sobrecarga; Alça portátil; Chicote de conexão rápida incluído; Modo de reparo; Proteção contra inversão de polaridade; Proteção contra curto-circuito; Garras à prova de faíscas; Compensação de temperatura; Montável em parede; Outro
nb: Funksjoner for bilbatterilader: Dynamotest; Automatisk avslåing / vedlikeholdsmodus; Batterivedlikeholdsmodus; Batteritestmodus; Klemledninger inkludert; Desulfatering / rekondisjoneringsmodus; Skjerm (LCD/LED); Motorstart / boost-modus; Viftekjølt; Overtemperaturbeskyttelse; Overladingsbeskyttelse; Bærehåndtak; Hurtigkoblingskabel inkludert; Reparasjonsmodus; Beskyttelse mot omvendt polaritet; Kortslutningsbeskyttelse; Gnistfrie klemmer; Temperaturkompensasjon; Veggmonterbar; Annet
el: Χαρακτηριστικά φορτιστή μπαταρίας οχήματος: Έλεγχος εναλλάκτη; Αυτόματη απενεργοποίηση / λειτουργία συντήρησης (float mode); Λειτουργία συντήρησης μπαταρίας; Λειτουργία δοκιμής μπαταρίας; Περιλαμβάνονται καλώδια με δαγκάνες; Λειτουργία αποθείωσης / αναζωογόνησης; Οθόνη (LCD/LED); Λειτουργία εκκίνησης κινητήρα / boost; Με ψύξη ανεμιστήρα; Προστασία από υπερθέρμανση; Προστασία από υπερφόρτιση; Φορητή λαβή; Περιλαμβάνεται πλεξούδα ταχείας σύνδεσης; Λειτουργία επισκευής; Προστασία από αντίστροφη πολικότητα; Προστασία από βραχυκύκλωμα; Δαγκάνες με προστασία από σπινθήρες; Αντιστάθμιση θερμοκρασίας; Δυνατότητα επιτοίχιας τοποθέτησης; Άλλο